Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 76-2701 to 76-2728 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Foreclosure Protection Act.

Laws 2008, LB123, § 1.
July 18, 2008